kam.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaBbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiĨĩKkLlMmNnOoSsTtUuŨũVvWwYyZz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="a"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>

    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>

    <sdef n="c1c2"/>
    <sdef n="c3c4"/>
    <sdef n="c5c6"/>
    <sdef n="c7c8"/>
    <sdef n="c9"/>
    <sdef n="c11c12"/>
    <sdef n="cA"/>
    <sdef n="cB"/>
    <sdef n="cC"/>
    <sdef n="cD"/>
    <sdef n="cE"/>
    <sdef n="cF"/>

    <sdef n="prox"/>
    <sdef n="dist"/>
    <sdef n="poss"/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="n__mU/a">
      <e><p> <l>mũ</l> <r><s n="c1c2"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/>mũ</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>a</l> <r><s n="c1c2"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/>mũ</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__mw/-">
      <e><p> <l>mw</l> <r><s n="c1c2"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/>mw</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l></l> <r><s n="c1c2"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/>mw</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__mU/mI">
      <e><p> <l>mũ</l> <r><s n="c3c4"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/>mũ</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>mĩ</l> <r><s n="c3c4"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/>mũ</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__mw/I">
      <e><p> <l>mw</l> <r><s n="c3c4"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/>mw</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ĩ</l> <r><s n="c3c4"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/>mw</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__mw/my">
      <e><p> <l>mw</l> <r><s n="c3c4"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/>mw</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>my</l> <r><s n="c3c4"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/>mw</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__I/ma">
      <e><p> <l>ĩ</l> <r><s n="c5c6"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/>ĩ</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ma</l> <r><s n="c5c6"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/>ĩ</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__I/m">
      <e><p> <l>ĩ</l> <r><s n="c5c6"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/>ĩ</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>m</l> <r><s n="c5c6"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/>ĩ</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__y/m">
      <e><p> <l>y</l> <r><s n="c5c6"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/>y</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>m</l> <r><s n="c5c6"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/>y</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__-/ma">
      <e><p> <l></l> <r><s n="c5c6"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ma</l> <r><s n="c5c6"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__kI/i">
      <e><p> <l>kĩ</l> <r><s n="c7c8"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/>kĩ</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>i</l> <r><s n="c7c8"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/>kĩ</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__kI/syI">
      <e><p> <l>kĩ</l> <r><s n="c7c8"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/>kĩ</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>syĩ</l> <r><s n="c7c8"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/>kĩ</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adj__">
      <e><p> <l>mũ</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>a</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="pl"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>mũ</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>mĩ</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="pl"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ĩ</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ma</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="pl"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kĩ</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c7c8"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l></l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c7c8"/><s n="pl"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l></l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c9"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ka</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c11c12"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>tũ</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c11c12"/><s n="pl"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>va</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="cA"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kũ</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="cB"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ma</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="cC"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l></l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="cD"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l></l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="cE"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>mũ</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="cF"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adj__s/nz">
      <e><p> <l>mũs</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="sg"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>as</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="pl"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>mũs</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="sg"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>mĩs</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="pl"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ĩs</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="sg"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>mas</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="pl"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kĩs</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c7c8"/><s n="sg"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>nz</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c7c8"/><s n="pl"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>nz</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c9"/><s n="sg"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kas</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c11c12"/><s n="sg"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>tũs</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="c11c12"/><s n="pl"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>vas</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="cA"/><s n="sg"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kũs</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="cB"/><s n="sg"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>mas</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="cC"/><s n="sg"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>nz</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="cD"/><s n="sg"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>nz</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="cE"/><s n="sg"/>s</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>mũ</l> <r><s n="a"/><s n="cF"/><s n="sg"/>s</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="mũndũ"><par n="n__mU/a"/><i>ndũ</i></e>
    <e lm="mwaki"><par n="n__mw/-"/><i>aki</i></e>
    <e lm="mũte"><par n="n__mU/mI"/><i>te</i></e>
    <e lm="mũaĩo"><par n="n__mU/mI"/><i>aĩo</i></e>
    <e lm="mũalyũlo"><par n="n__mU/mI"/><i>alyũlo</i></e>
    <e lm="mũamba"><par n="n__mU/mI"/><i>amba</i></e>
    <e lm="mũandĩko"><par n="n__mU/mI"/><i>andĩko</i></e>
    <e lm="mwaki"><par n="n__mw/I"/><i>aki</i></e>
    <e lm="mwaka"><par n="n__mw/my"/><i>aka</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩamũko"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>amũko</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩana"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>ana</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩandasi"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>andasi</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩandĩko"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>andĩko</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩandi"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>andi</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩandiko"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>andiko</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩanga"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>anga</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩangi"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>angi</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩelo"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>elo</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩema"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>ema</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩembe"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>embe</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩeyo"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>eyo</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩia"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>ia</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩika"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>ika</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩiko"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>iko</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩima"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>ima</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩindi"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>indi</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩiu"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>iu</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkalatasi"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>kali</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkalatya"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>kalatya</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkalĩ"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>kalĩ</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkalũ"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>kalũ</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkanda"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>kanda</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkanga"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>full moon</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkanisa"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>kanisa</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkanya"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>kanya</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkaya"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>kaya</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkeleko"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>keleko</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkene"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>kene</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkesa"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>kesa</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩkooa"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>kooa</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩlovoto"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>lovoto</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩsembo"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>sembo</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩseso"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>seso</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩsindano"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>sindano</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩsindano ma wanake"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>sindano ma wanake</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩsomo"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>somo</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩtema"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>tema</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩthaa"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>thaa</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩthaũ"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>thaũ</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩtialyo"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>tialyo</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩtukũ"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>tukũ</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩtumbe"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>tumbe</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩuta"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>uta</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩvia"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>via</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩvive"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>vive</i></e>
    <e lm="ĩwa"><par n="n__I/ma"/><i>wa</i></e>
    <e lm="yaka"><par n="n__y/m"/><i>aka</i></e>
    <e lm="yanga"><par n="n__y/m"/><i>anga</i></e>
    <e lm="thayũ"><par n="n__-/ma"/><i>thayũ</i></e>
    <e lm="kĩala"><par n="n__kI/i"/><i>ala</i></e>
    <e lm="kĩamata"><par n="n__kI/i"/><i>amata</i></e>
    <e lm="kĩamũko"><par n="n__kI/i"/><i>amũko</i></e>
    <e lm="kĩkoyo"><par n="n__kI/i"/><i>koyo</i></e>
    <e lm="kĩvĩla"><par n="n__kI/i"/><i>vĩla</i></e>
    <e lm="kĩtuo"><par n="n__kI/i"/><i>tuo</i></e>
    <e lm="kĩwũ"><par n="n__kI/syI"/><i>wũ</i></e>
    <e lm="nĩnĩ"><par n="adj__"/><i>nĩnĩ</i></e>
    <e lm="nene"><par n="adj__"/><i>nene</i></e>
    <e lm="seo"><par n="adj__s/nz"/><i>eo</i></e>
